test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-asikan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - asikan - ok : # -m animate noun, sock paradigm from Okisis p. 133
     asikan+N+AN+Sg: asikan
     asikan+N+AN+Pl: asikanak
     asikan+N+AN+Loc: [asikanihk, asikaninâhk]
     asikan+N+AN+Obv: asikana
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [asikanisis, asikanis]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [asikanisisak, asikanisak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [asikanisisihk, asikanisisinâhk, asikanisinâhk, asikanisihk]
          
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitasikan
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitasikan
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otasikana
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otasikaniyiwa
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitasikaninân
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitasikaninaw
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitasikaniwâw
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otasikaniwâwa
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otasikaniyiwa
          
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitasikanak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitasikanak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otasikana
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otasikaniyiwa
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitasikaninânak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitasikaninawak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitasikaniwâwak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otasikaniwâwa
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otasikaniyiwa
     
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nicasikanisis, nicasikanis]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kicasikanisis, kicasikanis]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: [ocasikanisisa, ocasikanisa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: [ocasikanisisiyiwa, ocasikanisiyiwa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: [nicasikanisisinân, nicasikanisinân]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: [kicasikanisisinaw, kicasikanisinaw]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: [kicasikanisisiwâw, kicasikanisiwâw]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisisiwâwa, ocasikanisiwâwa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisisiyiwa, ocasikanisiyiwa]

     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: [nicasikanisisak, nicasikanisak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: [kicasikanisisak, kicasikanisak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: [ocasikanisisa, ocasikanisa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: [ocasikanisisiyiwa, ocasikanisiyiwa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: [nicasikanisisinânak, nicasikanisinânak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: [kicasikanisisinawak, kicasikanisinawak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: [kicasikanisisiwâwak, kicasikanisiwâwak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisisiwâwa, ocasikanisiwâwa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisisiyiwa, ocasikanisiyiwa]
     
     asikan+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitasikanihk
     asikan+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitasikanihk
     asikan+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otasikanihk
     asikan+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otasikaniyihk
     asikan+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitasikaninâhk
     asikan+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitasikaninâhk
     asikan+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitasikaniwâhk
     asikan+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otasikaniwâhk
     asikan+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otasikaniyihk

     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: [nicasikanisisihk, nicasikanisihk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: [kicasikanisisihk, kicasikanisihk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: [ocasikanisisihk, ocasikanisihk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: [ocasikanisisiyihk, ocasikanisiyihk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: [nicasikanisisinâhk, nicasikanisinâhk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: [kicasikanisisinâhk, kicasikanisinâhk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: [kicasikanisisiwâhk, kicasikanisiwâhk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: [ocasikanisisiwâhk, ocasikanisiwâhk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: [ocasikanisisiyihk, ocasikanisiyihk]

     
